Massachusetts, session 194th, H540.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 186, the figure “9” and inserting in 
place thereof the following figure:- 5. 
SECTION 2. Said section 89 of said chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 187 to 191, inclusive, the words “provided, 
however, that a public school district's total charter tuition payment to commonwealth charter 
schools shall not exceed 18 per cent of the district's net school spending if the school district 
qualifies under paragraph (3)”. 
SECTION 3. Said section 89 of said chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out, in line 194, the figure “9” and inserting in place thereof 
the following figure:- 5. 

of 2 12  SECTION 4. Said section 89 of said chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 195 to 196, inclusive, the words “or 18 per cent 
for those districts that qualify under said paragraph (3)” 
SECTION 5. Said section 89 of said chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 218 to 223, inclusive, the words “the school 
district's total charter school tuition payment to commonwealth charter schools may exceed 9 per 
cent of the district's net school spending but shall not exceed 18 per cent. For a district qualifying 
under this paragraph whose charter school tuition payments exceed 9 per cent of the school 
district's net school spending,” 
SECTION 6. Said section 89 of said chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 275 to 281, inclusive, the words “If a district is 
no longer in the lowest 10 per cent, the net school spending cap shall be 9 per cent, unless the 
district net school spending was above 9 per cent in the year prior to moving out of the lowest 10 
per cent in which case the net school spending cap shall remain at the higher level plus 
enrollment previous approved by the board.” 
SECTION 7. Said section 89 of said chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 282 to 290, subsection (i)(4) in its entirety.